Utah statutes.
17-33-13.   Prohibited actions.

(1) It is an offense for a person to make any false statement, certificate, mark, rating, or report with regard to any test, certification, or appointment made under any provision of this law or in any manner commit or attempt to commit any fraud preventing the impartial execution of this chapter.

(2) It is an offense for a person, under circumstances not amounting to a violation of Section 76-8-103 or 76-8-105, to directly or indirectly, give, render, pay, offer, solicit, or accept any money, service, or other valuable consideration for any appointment, proposed appointment, promotion, or proposed promotion to, or for any advantage in, a position in the career service.

(3) It is an offense for any employee of the personnel department, examiner, or other person to:

(a)  defeat, deceive, or obstruct any person in his or her right to examination, eligibility, certification, or appointment under this chapter; or

(b)  furnish to any person any special or secret information for the purpose of affecting the rights or prospects of any person with respect to employment in the career service.

